Ohio, session 136, HB262.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 5.2541 of the Revised Code be 4
enacted to read as follows: 5
Sec. 5.2541. The weeks from mother's day, which is the 6
second Sunday in May, to father's day, which is the third Sunday 7
in June, shall be designated as "Natural Family Month." 8